Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1711, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1711. A. 1. As used in this subsection, “residents of


this state” shall mean individuals holding a valid Oklahoma driver


license or permit to operate a motor vehicle issued by Service


Oklahoma.


2. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority, subject to the provisions


hereof, is hereby authorized to fix, revise, charge, and collect

Req. No. 3109 Page 1


tolls for the use of each turnpike project and the different parts


or sections thereof, except for use by the following persons who


shall be entitled to free use of every such project:


a. law enforcement officers responsible for enforcing the


traffic laws and the general laws of the state and


federal governments on turnpikes, who shall be


entitled to free use of every such project in the


performance of official duties connected with such


turnpike project, and


b. residents of this state.


B. The Authority, subject to the provisions of this section, is


authorized to contract with any person, partnership, association, or


corporation desiring the use of any part thereof, including the


right-of-way adjoining the paved portion, for placing thereon


telephone, telegraph, electric light or power lines, gas stations,


garages, stores, hotels, restaurants, and advertising signs, or for


any other purpose except for tracks for railroad or railway use, and


to fix the terms, conditions, rents, and rates of charges for such


use.


C. Such tolls, subject to the other restrictions hereof, shall


be so fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate of tolls from


the turnpike project or projects in connection with which the bonds


of any issue shall have been issued as to provide a fund sufficient


with other revenues, if any, to pay (a) the cost of maintaining,

Req. No. 3109 Page 2


repairing, and operating such turnpike project or projects, and (b)


the principal of and the interest of such bonds as the same shall


become due and payable, and to create reserves for such purposes.


The tolls and all other revenues derived from the turnpike project


or projects in connection with which the bonds of any issue shall


have been issued, except such part thereof as may be necessary to


pay such cost of maintenance, repair, and operation and to provide


such reserves therefor as may be provided for in the resolution


authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement


securing the same shall be set aside at such regular intervals as


may be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement in a


sinking fund which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the


payment of (a) the interest upon such bonds as such interest shall


fall due, (b) the principal of such bonds as the same shall fall


due, (c) the necessary charges of paying agents for paying principal


and interest, and (d) the redemption price or the purchase price of


bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided, which are a


charge against such fund. The use and disposition of monies to the


credit of such sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of


the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of such


trust agreement. Except as may otherwise be provided in such


resolution or such trust agreement, such sinking fund shall be a


fund for all such bonds without distinction or priority of one over


another. The monies in the sinking fund, less such reserve as may

Req. No. 3109 Page 3


be provided in such resolution or trust agreement, if not used


within a reasonable time for the purchase of bonds for cancellation


as above provided, shall be applied to the redemption of bonds at


the redemption price then applicable.


D. Any person who leases, rents, or acquires control of any gas


station, garage, store, hotel, or restaurant must have been a


resident of, or been doing business in, Oklahoma for the past five


(5) years.


E. Notwithstanding anything else herein contained to the


contrary, the Corporation Commission of the State of Oklahoma shall


exercise the jurisdiction now or hereafter vested in it to regulate


and control the operation of motor carriers of passengers and


freight, using or desiring to use any turnpike project, in the


manner and to the extent that it regulates or controls such carriers


using the highways of the state.


F. The Authority shall not discriminate against any group or


class or individual member thereof in fixing the amount of toll,


rents, or charge for the use of the turnpike project.


G. The Authority shall promulgate any rules necessary to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 3109 Page 4


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3109 MSBB 1/14/2026 8:37:04 AM









































Req. No. 3109 Page 5